Utah statutes.
10-8-65.   Dogs -- License and tax -- Destruction, sale or other disposal.
They may license, tax, regulate or prohibit the keeping of dogs, and authorize
the destruction, sale or other disposal of the same when at large contrary to
ordinance.
